test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-piekk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - pieʹǩǩ â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: pieʹǩǩ
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: pieʹǩǩ
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: pieʹǩǩ
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: peâkka
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: pieʹǩǩest
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Com+Indef: pieʹǩǩin
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Ess+Indef: pieʹǩǩen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Par+Indef: pieʹǩǩed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [pieʹǩǩtaa, pieʹǩǩtää]
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: pieʹǩǩ
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: pieʹǩǩi
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: pieʹǩǩid
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: pieʹǩǩid
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: pieʹǩǩin
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Com+Indef: pieʹǩǩivuiʹm
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [pieʹǩǩitaa, pieʹǩǩitää]
